Hawaii statutes.
[§394B-8] Coordination with federal
programs. The director shall develop plans for the implementation of this
program which shall include appropriate provisions for the coordination of
program activities with related state and federal programs and which shall
document the requirements of section 394B-3 and describe those activities to be
carried out. [L 1983, c 195, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next